Massachusetts, session 194th, H4356.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 87A1/2 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (e) and inserting in place 
thereof the following subsection:- 
(e) The educational and experience requirement for a certificate shall be one of the 
following: (i) a bachelor’s degree or its equivalent from a college or university approved by the 
board and two years of full-time experience, or the equivalent approved by the board; or (ii) a 
bachelor’s degree with 30 semester hours of additional education from a college or university 
approved by the board and one year of full-time experience, or the equivalent approved by the 
board; or (iii) a master’s degree or its equivalent from a college or university approved by the 
board, and one year of full-time experience, or the equivalent approved by the board. The 
educational requirements to take the examination required to be passed as a condition for the 
granting of a certificate shall be set forth in regulations promulgated by the board. 

of 3 13  SECTION 2. Subsection (d)(2) of section 87B of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by striking out clauses (A) and (B), in lines 35-43, and inserting in place thereof 
the following clauses:- 
(A) is certified or licensed in the other state and is in good standing in the other state; 
(B) has passed the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination and has completed 
the education requirements listed in subsection (e) of section 87A1/2; or 
SECTION 3. Said section 87B is hereby further amended by striking out subsection 
(h)(2), and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-  
(h)(2) A person whose principal place of business is outside the commonwealth shall be 
deemed to have qualifications substantially equivalent to the commonwealth's requirements for 
the practice of public accountancy and shall be authorized to engage in the practice of certified 
public accountancy in the commonwealth, including offering and rendering professional 
services, whether in person or by mail, telephone or electronic means, if such person holds: (i) a 
valid license as a certified public accountant issued by any other state: provided that the 
individual has met the education and experience requirements listed in subsection (e) of 87A1/2 
and has passed the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination or exceed the licensure 
requirements of this chapter or approved by the board. Notwithstanding any other provision of 
law, no notice or other submission shall be required by any individual who offers or renders 
professional services under this section, whether in person or by mail, telephone, or electronic 
means. An individual who practices in this state pursuant to this section consents, as a condition 
of the grant of such practice privilege: to the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and 
disciplinary authority of the board; to comply with this section and the board’s rules; that in the 

of 3 35 event the individual’s license from the other state is no longer valid, the individual will cease 
offering or rendering professional services in the commonwealth individually or on behalf of a 
firm; provided, however, that any person who has passed the Uniform Certified Public 
Accountant Examination and holds a valid certified public accountant certificate issued by any 
other state prior to December 31, 2024 shall be deemed exempt from the education requirements 
in subsection (e) of section 87A1/2. Any person who qualifies for the practice privilege pursuant 
to this subsection may exercise such privilege in the commonwealth, without limitation on the 
period of time within which such person may so practice in the commonwealth as long as such 
person remains qualified pursuant to this subsection, and shall not be required to obtain a 
certificate or license pursuant to this section, except as provided in this subsection, submit any 
other notice to the board or obtain a temporary practice permit from, or pay any fee to the board. 
SECTION 4. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on January 1, 2026. 
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise specified, this act shall take effect upon its passage.